Hawaii statutes.
§653-13 Effect of discontinuance, appeal,
exceptions. In case of the withdrawal or discontinuance of the action, or
of the rendition of judgment therein wholly favorable to the beneficiary, from
or to which judgment no appeal or exceptions have been noted at the time when
it was rendered, and the certification thereof to the garnishee, the
inhibitions placed upon the garnishee by the service of the copy shall be void,
and of no further effect. But in case of judgment being rendered for either
party in the action from or to which an appeal or exceptions have been noted at
the time, the garnishee shall continue bound by the service until the result of
the appeal or exceptions have been duly certified to the garnishee as
hereinbefore provided. [L 1890, c 50, §11; RL 1925, §2857; RL 1935, §4302; RL
1945, §10333; RL 1955, §238-13; HRS §653-13; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next